Idaho, session 2025, S1020.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 57-1306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
57-1306. IMPACT FUNDS.
(1)(a) Upon receipt of any moneys from the federal government from
sales, royalties, bonuses or rentals of oil, gas or mineral lands of the
federal government, the state treasurer shall remit ten percent (10%)
of such receipts to the general fund of the several counties from which
the resources were extracted. The state treasurer shall compute a par-
ticular county's share of such receipts by computing the proportion of
the moneys generated by sales, royalties, bonuses or rentals of federal
lands situated within that particular county to the total of moneys
received from the federal government from sales, royalties, bonuses
or rentals of all oil, gas or mineral lands of the federal government
within the state of Idaho for the same period. The moneys remitted to
the various counties according to the provisions of this section shall
be used for the construction and maintenance of public roads or for the
support of public schools.
(b) The remaining ninety percent (90%) of any moneys received from the
federal government from sales, royalties, bonuses or rentals of oil,
gas or mineral lands of the federal government shall be deposited into
the public school income fund, pursuant to the provisions of section
33-903, Idaho Code.
(2)(a) The state treasurer shall remit ten percent (10%) of any moneys
received from the sale, royalties, bonuses or rental of renewable en-
ergy resources on lands of the federal government to the general fund of
the several counties from which the resources were developed. The state
treasurer shall compute a particular county's share of such receipts by
computing the proportion of the moneys generated by sales, royalties,
bonuses or rentals of federal lands situated within that particular
county to the total of moneys received from the federal government from
sales, royalties, bonuses or rentals of all renewable energy resource
lands of the federal government within the state of Idaho for the same
period. The moneys remitted to the various counties according to the
provisions of this section shall be used for the construction and main-
tenance of public roads or for the support of public schools.


(b) The remaining ninety percent (90%) of any moneys received from the
sale, royalties, bonuses or rental of renewable energy resources on
lands of the federal government and any moneys from the federal govern-
ment collected pursuant to the federal power act, 16 U.S.C. 803(e)(1),
for the use of lands of the federal government shall be deposited by
the state treasurer into the renewable energy resources fund, which is
hereby created. Any interest earned on the investment of idle moneys
in the renewable energy resources fund shall be returned to the fund.
Moneys in the renewable energy resources fund may be expended pursuant
to appropriation and may be used by the administrator of the office of
energy and mineral resources consistent with duties, powers and author-
ities of the office.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "renewable energy resources"
shall only include geothermal, wind and solar resources.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.